Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4738
Federal funding.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall apply for all available federal funding to implement the Infant Hearing Act.

Laws 2000, LB 950, § 5;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 592.